Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.112] OWNERSHIP DISCLOSURE. new text end new text begin A landlord must disclose to a tenant in writing the name and contact information for all parties with any interest in the real property subject to the lease. new text end